test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mansoTS_gt-norm.yaml
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансониʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансодиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансодиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансонаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансодаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансодоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансонась
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансодась
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансодась
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансонинзь
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансодинзь
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансодинзь
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансонаць
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансодаць
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансодонзь
     манˮ+N+Tra: манˮӈэ
     манˮ+N+Car: манциˮ
     манˮ+N+Equ: мантаремʼ
     манˮ+N+Equ+Lat: мантаревʼ
